tr: Uplink port tipi: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Diğer
sl-SI: Tip vrat za povezavo navzgor: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Drugo
da: Uplink-porttype: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Andet
cs: Typ uplink portu: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de porta de uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Outro
en: Uplink port type: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Other
sv: Upplänksporttyp: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Övrigt
nb: Opplinkporttype: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Annet
hu: Uplink-port típusa: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Egyéb
de: Video-Port-Typ: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Sonstiges
fr: Type de port de liaison montante: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Autre
lt-LT: Perdavimo prievado tipas: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Kita
es: Tipo de puerto de enlace ascendente: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Otros
ja: アップリンクポートタイプ: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; その他
it: Tipo di porta uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Altro
sk-SK: Typ uplink portu: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Iné
th: ประเภทพอร์ตอัปลิงก์: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Tip uplink priključka: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipul portului de uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Altele
bg-BG: Тип порт за изходяща връзка: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Други
ru: Тип порта восходящей связи: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Другой
nl: Uplink-poorttype: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Andere
fi: Ylälinkkiportin tyyppi: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Muu
pl: Typ portu uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de porta de uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Outro
vi: Loại cổng đường lên: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Khác
zh-TW: 上行鏈路埠類型: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; 其他
el: Τύπος θύρας uplink: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; Άλλο
ko: 업링크 포트 유형: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; 기타
zh-CN: 上行链路端口类型: QSFP; QSFP+; QSFP28; RJ45 10GBase-T; SFP; SFP+; SFP28; 其他